Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.565

Proceedings additional—Filing of criminal charges not required.

(1) Any proceeding under this chapter is in addition to other civil or criminal remedies.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring criminal charges to be filed as a condition of a protection order being issued.

[ 2021 c 215 s 68.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.